Wisconsin, session 2025, SB91.
do enact as follows:SB91,11Section 1. 302.114 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB91,2,52302.114 (1) An inmate is subject to this section if he or she is serving a life 3sentence imposed under s. 973.014 (1g) (a) 1. or 2. An inmate serving a life sentence 4under s. 939.62 (2m), 948.051 (1) (b) or (2) (b), or 973.014 (1g) (a) 3. is not eligible for 5release to extended supervision under this section.SB91,26Section 2. 303.065 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB91,2,97303.065 (1) (b) 2. A person serving a life sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) (c), 8948.051 (1) (b) or (2) (b), or 973.014 (1) (c) or (1g) (a) 3. may not be considered for 9work release.SB91,310Section 3. 304.02 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB91,2,1311304.02 (5) Notwithstanding subs. (1) to (3), a prisoner who is serving a life 12sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) (c), 948.051 (1) (b) or (2) (b), or 973.014 (1) (c) or (1g) 13is not eligible for release to parole supervision under this section.SB91,414Section 4. 948.051 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 948.051 (1) (intro.) and 15amended to read:SB91,3,71948.051 (1) (intro.) Whoever knowingly recruits, entices, provides, obtains, 2sells, purchases, harbors, transports, transfers, receives, patronizes, or solicits, 3isolates, holds, confines, or deprives of liberty or knowingly attempts to recruit, 4entice, provide, obtain, sell, purchase, harbor, transport, transfer, receive, 5patronize, or solicit, isolate, hold, confine, or deprive of liberty any child for the 6purpose of commercial sex acts, as defined in s. 940.302 (1) (a), is guilty of a the 7following:SB91,3,88(a) Except as provided in par. (b), a Class C felony.SB91,59Section 5. 948.051 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB91,3,1210948.051 (1) (b) If the act involves at least 3 victims who are children at the 11time the act is committed, a Class A felony. The term of imprisonment is life 12imprisonment without the possibility of extended supervision.SB91,613Section 6. 948.051 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 948.051 (2) (intro.) and 14amended to read:SB91,3,1715948.051 (2) (intro.) Whoever benefits in any manner from a violation of sub. 16(1) is guilty of a Class C felony the following if the person knows that the benefits 17come from an act described in sub. (1).:SB91,718Section 7. 948.051 (2) (a) and (b) of the statutes are created to read:SB91,3,1919948.051 (2) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), a Class C felony.SB91,3,2220(b) If the violation involves at least 3 victims who are children at the time of 21the violation, a Class A felony. The term of imprisonment is life imprisonment 22without the possibility of extended supervision.SB91,823Section 8. 973.014 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB91,4,51973.014 (2) When a court sentences a person to life imprisonment under s. 2939.62 (2m) (c), the court shall provide that the sentence is without the possibility 3of parole or extended supervision. When a court sentences a person to life 4imprisonment under s. 948.051 (1) (b) or (2) (b), the court shall provide that the 5sentence is without the possibility of extended supervision.SB91,96Section 9. Initial applicability.SB91,4,87(1) This act first applies to offenses that are committed on the effective date of 8this subsection.SB91,4,99